Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20252-1508
Commission; rank and score applications for funding; criteria.

The commission shall rank and score applications for funding based on criteria that demonstrate the extent to which a program, project, or activity:

(1) Remediates or mitigates threats to drinking water;

(2) Meets the goals and objectives of an approved integrated management plan or ground water management plan;

(3) Contributes to water sustainability goals by increasing aquifer recharge, reducing aquifer depletion, or increasing streamflow;

(4) Contributes to multiple water supply management goals, including, but not limited to, flood control, agricultural use, municipal and industrial uses, recreational benefits, wildlife habitat, conservation of water resources, and preservation of water resources;

(5) Maximizes the beneficial use of Nebraska's water resources for the benefit of the state's residents;

(6) Is cost-effective;

(7) Helps the state meet its obligations under interstate compacts, decrees, or other state contracts or agreements or federal law;

(8) Reduces threats to property damage or protects critical infrastructure that consists of the physical assets, systems, and networks vital to the state or the United States such that their incapacitation would have a debilitating effect on public security or public health and safety;

(9) Improves water quality;

(10) Has utilized all available funding resources of the local jurisdiction to support the program, project, or activity;

(11) Has a local jurisdiction with plans in place that support sustainable water use;

(12) Addresses a statewide problem or issue;

(13) Contributes to the state's ability to leverage state dollars with local or federal government partners or other partners to maximize the use of its resources; and

(14) Contributes to watershed health and function.

Laws 2014, LB1098, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 15.